New York, session 2025-2026, A5823.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 3 of paragraph b of subdivision 3 of section 2 22 of the executive law, as amended by section 3 of part B of chapter 56 3 of the laws of 2010, is amended to read as follows: 4 (3) a system for warning populations who are or may be endangered, 5 such system shall include audible alerts for all announcements to ensure 6 that information is accessible to visually impaired individuals; 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09840-01-5